Wyoming, session 2026, HB0128.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 39-14-205 by creating a new
subsection (q) is amended to read:
39-14-205. Exemptions.
(q) Tertiary production resulting from projects
certified by the Wyoming oil and gas conservation
commission after July 1, 2026 and before July 1, 2031 is
exempt from the severance taxes imposed by W.S.
39-14-204(a)(iii) for a period of five (5) years from the
date of first tertiary production. Not later than November
1, 2026 and each November 1 thereafter until November 1,
2036, the oil and gas conservation commission and the
department shall report on the tertiary production
qualifying for the exemption under this subsection. The
report shall include the amount of production, the number
of operators qualifying for the exemption, the number of
wells, the amount of severance taxes paid on that
production, the amount of severance taxes exempted under
this subsection and the ad valorem and sales taxes paid in
connection with that production.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0128
ENROLLED ACT NO. 18, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2